Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2026
2-958.02

Grant program; applications; selection; considerations;
priority; section, how construed; director; powers and duties.

(1) From funds available in the Noxious Weed and Invasive Plant Species
Assistance Fund, the director may administer a grant program to assist local
control authorities and other weed management entities in the cost of
implementing and maintaining noxious weed control programs and in addressing
special weed control problems as provided in this section.

(2) The director shall receive applications by local control authorities and
weed management entities for assistance under this subsection and, in
consultation with the advisory committee created under section 2-965.01, award
grants for any of the following eligible purposes:

(a) To conduct applied research to solve locally significant weed management
problems;

(b) To demonstrate innovative control methods or land management practices
which have the potential to reduce landowner costs to control noxious weeds or
improve the effectiveness of noxious weed control;

(c) To encourage the formation of weed management entities;

(d) To respond to introductions or infestations of invasive plants that
threaten or potentially threaten the productivity of cropland and rangeland over
a wide area;

(e) To respond to introductions and infestations of invasive plant species
that threaten or potentially threaten the productivity and biodiversity of
wildlife and fishery habitats on public and private lands;

(f) To respond to special weed control problems involving weeds not included
in the list of noxious weeds promulgated by rule and regulation of the director
if the director has approved a petition to bring such weeds under the county
control program;

(g) To conduct monitoring or surveillance activities to detect, map, or
determine the distribution of invasive plant species and to determine
susceptible locations for the introduction or spread of invasive plant species;
and

(h) To conduct educational activities.

(3) The director shall select and prioritize applications for assistance under
subsection (2) of this section based on the following considerations:

(a) The seriousness of the noxious weed or invasive plant problem or potential
problem addressed by the project;

(b) The ability of the project to provide timely intervention to save current
and future costs of control and eradication;

(c) The likelihood that the project will prevent or resolve the problem or
increase knowledge about resolving similar problems in the future;

(d) The extent to which the project will leverage federal funds and other
nonstate funds;

(e) The extent to which the applicant has made progress in addressing noxious
weed or invasive plant problems;

(f) The extent to which the project will provide a comprehensive approach to
the control or eradication of noxious weeds or invasive plant species as
identified and listed by the Nebraska Invasive Species Council;

(g) The extent to which the project will reduce or prevent the total
population or area of infestation of a noxious weed or invasive plant species as
identified and listed by the Nebraska Invasive Species Council;

(h) The extent to which the project uses the principles of integrated
vegetation management and sound science; and

(i) Such other factors that the director determines to be relevant.

(4) Nothing in this section shall be construed to relieve control authorities
of their duties and responsibilities under the Noxious Weed Control Act or the
duty of a person to control the spread of noxious weeds on lands owned and
controlled by him or her.

(5) The Department of Agriculture may adopt and promulgate necessary rules and
regulations to carry out this section.

(6) The director may annually apply for conservation funding from the Natural
Resources Conservation Service of the United States Department of
Agriculture.

Laws 2004, LB 869, § 5;

Laws 2007, LB701, § 4;

Laws 2009, LB98, § 2;

Laws 2016, LB1038, § 2;

Laws 2022, LB805, § 1;

Laws 2026, LB807, § 2.

July 18, 2026